Alaska, session 34, HB265.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 (SECTION 1 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON PAGE 2) 01 * Section 1. The following appropriation items are for operating expenditures from the 02 general fund or other funds as set out in the fiscal year 2027 budget summary for the 03 operating budget by funding source to the agencies named for the purposes expressed for the 04 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, unless otherwise indicated. 05 Appropriation General Other 06 Allocations Items Funds Funds 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 * * * * * Department of Administration * * * * * 09 * * * * * * * * * * 10 Legal and Advocacy Services 4,318,500 3,894,900 423,600 11 Office of Public Advocacy 2,892,500 12 Public Defender Agency 1,426,000 13 * * * * * * * * * * 14 * * * * * Department of Corrections * * * * * 15 * * * * * * * * * * 16 Community Residential Centers 6,970,500 6,970,500 17 Community Residential 6,970,500 18 Centers 19 Health and Rehabilitation Services 10,209,500 9,707,800 501,700 20 Behavioral Health Care 8,565,600 21 Substance Abuse Treatment 1,643,900 22 Program 23 * * * * * * * * * * 24 * * * * * Department of Education and Early Development * * * * * 25 * * * * * * * * * * 26 Education Support and Admin Services 532,200 377,800 154,400 27 Student and School 532,200 28 Achievement 29 * * * * * * * * * * 30 * * * * * Department of Family and Community Services * * * * * 31 * * * * * * * * * * 01 Alaska Psychiatric Institute 22,237,600 22,237,600 02 Alaska Psychiatric 21,575,600 03 Institute 04 Facility Rent, Operations, 662,000 05 and Maintenance 06 Children's Services 2,226,900 2,226,900 07 Children's Services 69,500 08 Management 09 Front Line Social Workers 148,500 10 Family Preservation 726,000 11 Foster Care Augmented Rate 500,000 12 Foster Care Special Need 782,900 13 Juvenile Justice 1,770,900 1,670,900 100,000 14 McLaughlin Youth Center 989,800 15 Fairbanks Youth Facility 143,300 16 Bethel Youth Facility 211,800 17 Probation Services 326,000 18 Juvenile Justice Health 100,000 19 Care 20 Departmental Support Services 8,288,300 7,799,000 489,300 21 Coordinated Health and 8,288,300 22 Complex Care 23 * * * * * * * * * * 24 * * * * * Department of Health * * * * * 25 * * * * * * * * * * 26 Behavioral Health 58,842,700 57,033,100 1,809,600 27 Behavioral Health Treatment 36,461,100 28 and Recovery Grants 29 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 30 balance on June 30, 2026, of the Alcohol and Other Drug Abuse Treatment & Prevention 31 Fund, the Recidivism Reduction Fund, and the Marijuana Education & Treatment Fund for 01 taxes collected under AS 43.60.010 and AS 43.61.010. 02 Alcohol Safety Action 1,311,100 03 Program (ASAP) 04 Behavioral Health 10,720,300 05 Administration 06 Behavioral Health 6,710,300 07 Prevention and Early 08 Intervention Grants 09 Alaska Mental Health Board 1,036,300 10 and Advisory Board on 11 Alcohol and Drug Abuse 12 Suicide Prevention Council 626,200 13 Residential Child Care 1,614,400 14 Behavioral Health Facility 363,000 15 Operations and Maintenance 16 Health Care Services 283,000 283,000 17 Health Facilities Licensing 128,700 18 and Certification 19 The amount allocated for Health Facilities Licensing and Certification includes the 20 unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of general fund program receipts 21 collected for biennial license fees issued under AS 47.32.050. 22 Residential Licensing 154,300 23 Public Health 5,133,000 4,516,200 616,800 24 Women, Children and Family 2,181,000 25 Health 26 Emergency Programs 700 27 Chronic Disease Prevention 2,604,800 28 and Health Promotion 29 Bureau of Vital Statistics 74,500 30 Public Health Facility 272,000 31 Operations and Maintenance 01 Senior and Disabilities Services 18,309,200 16,506,300 1,802,900 02 Senior and Disabilities 1,180,600 03 Community Based Grants 04 Early Intervention/Infant 13,444,500 05 Learning Programs 06 Senior and Disabilities 2,155,900 07 Services Administration 08 General Relief/Temporary 740,300 09 Assisted Living 10 Commission on Aging 271,000 11 Governor's Council on 474,400 12 Disabilities and Special 13 Education 14 Senior and Disabilities 42,500 15 Services Facility 16 Operations and Maintenance 17 Medicaid Services 82,155,800 82,155,800 18 Medicaid Services 82,155,800 19 It is the intent of the legislature that the Department of Health augment the rates for 20 adolescent behavioral health treatment services provided by Level 3 residential programs as 21 certified by the American Society of Addiction Medicine to reflect the additional costs of 22 caring for youth. 23 It is the intent of the legislature that the Department of Health increase the rate per service 24 increment of private duty nursing services from $20.00 to $30.00 for Registered Nurses, and 25 from $18.75 to $26.25 for Licensed Practical or Vocational Nurses. 26 * * * * * * * * * * 27 * * * * * Department of Labor and Workforce Development * * * * * 28 * * * * * * * * * * 29 Commissioner and Administrative 25,900 25,900 30 Services 31 Labor Market Information 25,900 01 Vocational Rehabilitation 100,000 100,000 02 Vocational Rehabilitation 100,000 03 Administration 04 The amount allocated for Vocational Rehabilitation Administration includes the unexpended 05 and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of receipts from all prior fiscal years collected 06 under the Department of Labor and Workforce Development's federal indirect cost plan for 07 expenditures incurred by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development. 08 * * * * * * * * * * 09 * * * * * Department of Law * * * * * 10 * * * * * * * * * * 11 Civil Division 100,100 100,100 12 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 13 balance on June 30, 2026, of inter-agency receipts collected in the Department of Law's 14 federally approved cost allocation plan. 15 Health, Safety & Welfare 100,100 16 * * * * * * * * * * 17 * * * * * Department of Natural Resources * * * * * 18 * * * * * * * * * * 19 Administration & Support Services 6,438,200 6,438,200 20 Mental Health Trust Lands 5,542,400 21 Administration 22 Mental Health Trust Lands 895,800 23 Facility Operations and 24 Maintenance 25 * * * * * * * * * * 26 * * * * * Department of Public Safety * * * * * 27 * * * * * * * * * * 28 Alaska State Troopers 60,000 60,000 29 Alaska State Trooper 60,000 30 Detachments 31 Alaska Police Standards Council 80,000 80,000 01 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 02 balance on June 30, 2026, of the receipts collected under AS 12.25.195(c), AS 12.55.039, AS 03 28.05.151, and AS 29.25.074 and receipts collected under AS 18.65.220(7). 04 Alaska Police Standards 80,000 05 Council 06 Integrated Victim Assistance 1,617,500 1,617,500 07 Council on Domestic 1,617,500 08 Violence and Sexual Assault 09 * * * * * * * * * * 10 * * * * * Department of Revenue * * * * * 11 * * * * * * * * * * 12 Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority 6,718,500 787,100 5,931,400 13 Mental Health Trust 5,931,400 14 Operations 15 Long Term Care Ombudsman 787,100 16 Office 17 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation 200,000 200,000 18 AHFC Operations 200,000 19 * * * * * * * * * * 20 * * * * * University of Alaska * * * * * 21 * * * * * * * * * * 22 University of Alaska 3,431,800 805,800 2,626,000 23 Anchorage Campus 3,381,800 24 Troth Yeddha' Campus 50,000 25 * * * * * * * * * * 26 * * * * * Judiciary * * * * * 27 * * * * * * * * * * 28 Alaska Court System 634,800 532,800 102,000 29 Trial Courts 634,800 30 Therapeutic Courts 4,678,200 4,519,900 158,300 31 Therapeutic Courts 4,678,200 01 (SECTION 2 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 2. The following appropriation items are for operating expenditures from the general 02 fund or other funds as set out in sec. 3 of this Act to the state agencies named and for the 03 purposes set out in the new legislation for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026 and ending 04 June 30, 2027, unless otherwise indicated. The appropriations in this section fund legislation 05 assumed to have passed during the second regular session of the thirty-fourth legislature. If a 06 measure listed in this section fails to pass and its substance is not incorporated in some other 07 measure, or is vetoed by the governor, the appropriation for that measure shall be reduced 08 accordingly. 09 Appropriation 10 SB 178 EXPAND EARLY INTERVENTION SERVICES 11 Department of Health 12 Senior and Disabilities Services 13 Senior and Disabilities Services Administration 14 1037 GF/MH 454,500 15 *** Total New Legislation Funding *** 454,500 16 (SECTION 3 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 3. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 1 02 and sec. 2 of this Act. 03 New 04 Funding Source Operating Legislation Total 05 Department of Administration 06 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 3,894,900 0 3,894,900 07 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority 423,600 0 423,600 08 Authorized Receipts 09 *** Total Agency Funding *** 4,318,500 0 4,318,500 10 Department of Corrections 11 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 9,707,800 0 9,707,800 12 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority 501,700 0 501,700 13 Authorized Receipts 14 1246 Recidivism Reduction Fund 6,970,500 0 6,970,500 15 *** Total Agency Funding *** 17,180,000 0 17,180,000 16 Department of Education and Early Development 17 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 377,800 0 377,800 18 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority 154,400 0 154,400 19 Authorized Receipts 20 *** Total Agency Funding *** 532,200 0 532,200 21 Department of Family and Community Services 22 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 33,934,400 0 33,934,400 23 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority 589,300 0 589,300 24 Authorized Receipts 25 *** Total Agency Funding *** 34,523,700 0 34,523,700 26 Department of Health 27 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 129,463,000 454,500 129,917,500 28 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority 4,229,300 0 4,229,300 29 Authorized Receipts 30 1180 Alcohol and Other Drug Abuse 20,100,000 0 20,100,000 31 Treatment & Prevention Fund 01 1246 Recidivism Reduction Fund 4,412,000 0 4,412,000 02 1254 Marijuana Education and 6,519,400 0 6,519,400 03 Treatment Fund 04 *** Total Agency Funding *** 164,723,700 454,500 165,178,200 05 Department of Labor and Workforce Development 06 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority 125,900 0 125,900 07 Authorized Receipts 08 *** Total Agency Funding *** 125,900 0 125,900 09 Department of Law 10 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 100,100 0 100,100 11 *** Total Agency Funding *** 100,100 0 100,100 12 Department of Natural Resources 13 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority 6,438,200 0 6,438,200 14 Authorized Receipts 15 *** Total Agency Funding *** 6,438,200 0 6,438,200 16 Department of Public Safety 17 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority 140,000 0 140,000 18 Authorized Receipts 19 1246 Recidivism Reduction Fund 1,617,500 0 1,617,500 20 *** Total Agency Funding *** 1,757,500 0 1,757,500 21 Department of Revenue 22 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 787,100 0 787,100 23 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority 200,000 0 200,000 24 Authorized Receipts 25 1094 Mental Health Trust 5,931,400 0 5,931,400 26 Administration 27 *** Total Agency Funding *** 6,918,500 0 6,918,500 28 University of Alaska 29 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 805,800 0 805,800 30 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority 2,626,000 0 2,626,000 31 Authorized Receipts 01 *** Total Agency Funding *** 3,431,800 0 3,431,800 02 Judiciary 03 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 5,052,700 0 5,052,700 04 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority 260,300 0 260,300 05 Authorized Receipts 06 *** Total Agency Funding *** 5,313,000 0 5,313,000 07 * * * * * Total Budget * * * * * 245,363,100 454,500 245,817,600 08 (SECTION 4 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 4. The following sets out the statewide funding for the appropriations made in sec. 1 02 and sec. 2 of this Act. 03 New 04 Funding Source Operating Legislation Total 05 Unrestricted General 06 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 184,123,600 454,500 184,578,100 07 *** Total Unrestricted General *** 184,123,600 454,500 184,578,100 08 Designated General 09 1180 Alcohol and Other Drug Abuse 20,100,000 0 20,100,000 10 Treatment & Prevention Fund 11 1246 Recidivism Reduction Fund 13,000,000 0 13,000,000 12 1254 Marijuana Education and 6,519,400 0 6,519,400 13 Treatment Fund 14 *** Total Designated General *** 39,619,400 0 39,619,400 15 Other Non-Duplicated 16 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority 15,688,700 0 15,688,700 17 Authorized Receipts 18 1094 Mental Health Trust 5,931,400 0 5,931,400 19 Administration 20 *** Total Other Non-Duplicated *** 21,620,100 0 21,620,100 21 (SECTION 5 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 5. The following appropriations are for capital projects and grants from the general 02 fund or other funds as set out in sec. 5 of this Act by funding source to the agencies named for 03 the purposes expressed. They lapse under AS 37.25.020, unless otherwise noted. 04 Appropriation General Other 05 Allocations Items Funds Funds 06 * * * * * * * * * * 07 * * * * * Department of Health * * * * * 08 * * * * * * * * * * 09 MH Trust: Deferred Maintenance and 500,000 500,000 10 Accessibility Improvements (HD 1-40) 11 MH Trust: Home Modification and 1,150,000 1,150,000 12 Upgrades to Retain Housing (HD 1-40) 13 MH Trust: Person Centered 250,000 250,000 14 Transportation (HD 1-40) 15 MH Trust: Universal Changing Spaces 250,000 250,000 16 Assistance Fund (HD 1-40) 17 * * * * * * * * * * 18 * * * * * Department of Revenue * * * * * 19 * * * * * * * * * * 20 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation 21 MH Trust: AHFC Homeless Assistance 10,150,000 9,200,000 950,000 22 Program (HD 1-40) 23 MH Trust: AHFC Beneficiary and Special 1,950,000 1,750,000 200,000 24 Needs Housing (HD 1-40) 25 MH Trust: AHFC Rural Housing 135,000 135,000 26 Coordinator - Ketchikan (HD 1-40) 27 * * * * * * * * * * 28 * * * * * Department of Transportation and Public Facilities * * * * * 29 * * * * * * * * * * 30 MH Trust: Coordinated Transportation 700,000 700,000 31 and Vehicles (HD 1-40) 01 (SECTION 6 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 6. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 5 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Department of Health 05 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 1,150,000 06 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized Receipts 1,000,000 07 *** Total Agency Funding *** 2,150,000 08 Department of Revenue 09 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized Receipts 1,285,000 10 1139 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation Dividend 10,950,000 11 *** Total Agency Funding *** 12,235,000 12 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities 13 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 700,000 14 *** Total Agency Funding *** 700,000 15 * * * * * Total Budget * * * * * 15,085,000 16 (SECTION 7 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 7. The following sets out the statewide funding for the appropriations made in sec. 5 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Unrestricted General 05 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 1,850,000 06 1139 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation Dividend 10,950,000 07 *** Total Unrestricted General *** 12,800,000 08 Other Non-Duplicated 09 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized Receipts 2,285,000 10 *** Total Other Non-Duplicated *** 2,285,000 11 (SECTION 8 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 8. PURPOSE. In accordance with AS 37.14.003 and 37.14.005, the appropriations 02 made in this Act are for the state's integrated comprehensive mental health program. 03 * Sec. 9. NONGENERAL FUND RECEIPTS. (a) Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority 04 authorized receipts (AS 37.14.036) or administration receipts (AS 37.14.036) that exceed the 05 amounts appropriated in this Act are appropriated conditioned upon compliance with the 06 program review provisions of AS 37.07.080(h). 07 (b) If Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority authorized receipts (AS 37.14.036) or 08 administration receipts (AS 37.14.036) fall short of the estimates used as the basis of the 09 appropriation, the affected appropriation is reduced by the amount of the shortfall in receipts. 10 * Sec. 10. SALARY AND BENEFIT ADJUSTMENTS. (a) The appropriations made in sec. 11 1 of this Act include amounts for salary and benefit adjustments for public officials, officers, 12 and employees of the executive branch, Alaska Court System employees, employees of the 13 legislature, and legislators and to implement the monetary terms for the fiscal year ending 14 June 30, 2027, of the following ongoing collective bargaining agreements: 15 (1) Public Employees Local 71, for the labor, trades, and crafts unit; 16 (2) Alaska Public Employees Association, for the supervisory unit; 17 (3) Teachers' Education Association of Mt. Edgecumbe, representing the 18 teachers of Mt. Edgecumbe High School; 19 (4) Alaska Vocational Technical Center Teachers' Association, National 20 Education Association, representing the employees of the Alaska Vocational Technical 21 Center; 22 (5) International Organization of Masters, Mates, and Pilots, representing the 23 masters, mates, and pilots unit; 24 (6) Alaska State Employees Association, for the general government unit; 25 (7) Marine Engineers' Beneficial Association, representing licensed engineers 26 employed by the Alaska marine highway system; 27 (8) Confidential Employees Association, representing the confidential unit; 28 (9) Inlandboatmen's Union of the Pacific, Alaska Region, representing the 29 unlicensed marine unit; 30 (10) Alaska Correctional Officers Association, representing the correctional 31 officers unit; 01 (11) Public Safety Employees Association, representing the regularly 02 commissioned public safety officers unit members within the Department of Transportation 03 and Public Facilities; 04 (12) Public Safety Employees Association, representing the regularly 05 commissioned public safety officers unit members within the Department of Public Safety. 06 (b) The appropriations made to the University of Alaska in sec. 1 of this Act include 07 amounts for salary and benefit adjustments to implement the monetary terms for the fiscal 08 year ending June 30, 2027, of the following collective bargaining agreements: 09 (1) Alaska Graduate Workers Association/UAW; 10 (2) United Academics - American Association of University Professors, 11 American Federation of Teachers; 12 (3) United Academic - Adjuncts - American Association of University 13 Professors, American Federation of Teachers; 14 (4) Alaska Higher Education Crafts and Trades Employees, Local 6070; 15 (5) Fairbanks Firefighters Union, IAFF Local 1324. 16 (c) If a collective bargaining agreement listed in (a) of this section is not ratified by 17 the membership of the respective collective bargaining unit, the appropriations made in this 18 Act applicable to the collective bargaining unit's agreement are adjusted proportionately by 19 the amount for that collective bargaining agreement, and the corresponding funding source 20 amounts are adjusted accordingly. 21 (d) If a collective bargaining agreement listed in (b) of this section is not ratified by 22 the membership of the respective collective bargaining unit and approved by the Board of 23 Regents of the University of Alaska, the appropriations made in this Act applicable to the 24 collective bargaining unit's agreement are adjusted proportionately by the amount for that 25 collective bargaining agreement, and the corresponding funding source amounts are adjusted 26 accordingly. 27 (e) Appropriations made in sec. 1 of this Act for salary and benefit adjustments as 28 described in (a) and (b) of this section are for the benefit of the state's integrated 29 comprehensive mental health program only and do not necessarily affect every group of 30 noncovered employees or every collective bargaining unit listed in (a) and (b) of this section. 31 * Sec. 11. This Act takes effect July 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.